Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 2

Landfill Methane Development Act

65-28-201. Short title — Legislative intent — Construction.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Landfill Methane Development Act.”

It is recognized by the general assembly that the provision of dependable and economical sources of energy is vital to the health, welfare and economic well-being of the citizens and residents of the state and that one of the primary sources of energy in this state is natural gas. The general assembly further recognizes world supplies of natural gas are limited and that the market for natural gas has undergone major changes in recent years due to increasing demand. It is recognized by the general assembly that the primary constituent of natural gas is methane, and that methane is generated by the natural decomposition of materials deposited in solid waste landfills. Landfill methane is produced in landfills together with other gaseous materials, but the methane may be extracted, treated, and sold as a substitute for natural gas. It is also recognized by the general assembly that, if not utilized for a natural gas substitute or other energy or commercial use, the landfill methane may constitute a pollutant if released into the atmosphere; and, in certain instances under state and federal environmental laws, the landfill methane must be collected and destroyed and the commercial value of the landfill methane would then be wasted. In order to ensure that all persons have the flexibility and power to compete for and obtain methane from landfill gas and treat landfill gas for substitution for natural gas on terms that will result in continuing availability of both natural gas and landfill methane at reasonable rates to the citizens and residents of the state, and to encourage the reduction or elimination of atmospheric pollution that may occur if the landfill methane were allowed to be introduced into the atmosphere, it is the intent of the general assembly by this part to:

Authorize any person to finance, acquire, own, operate, lease and dispose of rights, titles and interest of every kind and nature in facilities to produce and treat methane produced from landfill properties located within the state as a substitute for natural gas;

Allow any pipeline corporation subject to the jurisdiction of the Tennessee public utility commission to transport landfill methane gas, either alone or mixed with natural gas; and

Authorize any person to contract for the purchase of supplies of landfill methane useable in lieu of natural gas, and transport landfill methane by pipeline from any supplier located inside or outside the state, either alone or mixed with natural gas.

This part shall be liberally construed in conformity with such intent, it being hereby determined and declared that the means provided by this part are needed to provide for the continued availability to state citizens and residents of natural gas or substitutes for natural gas at reasonable rates.

Acts 2005, ch. 361, § 2; 2017, ch. 94, § 60.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in (b)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-28-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Landfill methane” means the methane gas constituent of naturally-occurring emissions in gaseous form emanating from any landfill, whether such landfill is in current operation accepting additional fill material or is closed and not accepting any additional fill material, and whether or not any such landfill has or is required to have any collection system for the collection of landfill gas, including the landfill methane component of landfill gas. “Landfill methane” means the methane component of landfill gas, both before and after such component may be extracted from the landfill gas, as the context may require; and

“Person” means any person, firm, corporation or other legal entity of any kind, including this state, every county in this state, and every municipality in this state.

Acts 2005, ch. 361, § 3.

65-28-203. Construction and operation of landfill methane facility.

Any person, with the consent of the owner of any landfill where landfill methane may be produced, and in compliance with all applicable laws, may construct and operate a facility for extracting, purifying, dehydrating, or otherwise treating landfill methane, for the purpose of preparing such landfill methane for transportation and sale to any person for use as a substitute for natural gas. No person constructing or operating any such facility or transporting or selling any landfill methane produced or treated in any such facility to any other person shall be considered to be engaged in the retail distribution of natural gas to the maximum extent of operations, transportation, or sale of all landfill methane volumes produced, transported, and sold, wherever such volumes may be sold and delivered, and whether or not such landfill methane is combined or intermixed after production with natural gas for transportation or sale.

Acts 2005, ch. 361, § 4.

65-28-204. Certificate of public convenience and necessity not required — Economic regulation.

No person desiring to construct or operate a facility for gathering, extracting, purifying, dehydrating, or otherwise treating landfill methane shall be required to obtain any certificate of public convenience and necessity for such construction or operation of such facility from the Tennessee public utility commission. Neither the rates and charges between the parties for construction and operation of any such facility, nor the sales price of any landfill methane produced or treated, shall be subject to economic regulation by the Tennessee public utility commission or any other agency of the state; provided, that the construction and operation of any facility for such operations shall be subject to all other applicable laws.

Acts 2005, ch. 361, § 5; 2017, ch. 94, § 60.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” two times.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-28-205. Rates and charges — Regulation.

The rates and charges for transportation by pipeline of landfill methane, either alone or in combination with natural gas, and the construction of facilities for the transportation by pipeline of landfill methane, whether alone or in combination with natural gas, shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the Tennessee public utility commission to the same extent as the rates and charges, and the construction of facilities for, pipeline transportation of natural gas. No person that is exempt from regulation by the Tennessee public utility commission in the transportation of natural gas shall become subject to such regulation by operation of this section or the transportation by such person of landfill methane, either alone or in combination with natural gas. No person shall be required to transport landfill methane by pipeline in combination with natural gas, if the landfill methane tendered for transportation does not meet quality specifications reasonably required by such person for pipeline transportation of natural gas. The Tennessee public utility commission shall expedite the disposition of any proceeding brought concerning any rate, charge, or construction of facilities for transportation by pipeline of landfill methane.

Acts 2005, ch. 361, § 6; 2017, ch. 94, § 60.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-28-206. Transportation of landfill methane.

Notwithstanding any other law, landfill methane may be transported by any pipeline corporation located wholly in this state or otherwise subject to the regulatory jurisdiction of the Tennessee public utility commission, without regard to where the landfill methane may have been produced or extracted or is to be delivered within the state, and without regard to the size or classification or nature of any customer purchasing or receiving any landfill methane. Such transportation may be provided by an intrastate pipeline corporation by transporting landfill methane either alone or in combination with natural gas.

Acts 2005, ch. 361, § 7; 2017, ch. 94, § 60.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-28-207. Natural gas local distribution system not required to transport landfill methane.

Nothing in this part shall be interpreted to require any natural gas local distribution system to purchase or transport any landfill produced methane gas.

Acts 2005, ch. 361, § 8.

65-28-208. Addition of refined landfill methane into natural gas stream.

The addition of refined landfill methane described in this part into any natural gas stream and the resulting use of the gas stream consisting in part of the refined landfill methane and in part of natural gas by any person purchasing or receiving the gas shall be considered for all purposes to be the use of natural gas within the meaning of any permit previously granted or granted in the future to the person by any agency of this state. It is expressly provided that this section does not authorize the use of raw, unprocessed or unrefined gas generated by decomposition at solid waste landfills to be sold or used as natural gas whether alone or in combination with natural gas. Any prohibition in any existing or future permit issued by this state applicable by its terms to the use of landfill gas shall be deemed to refer only to the use of the raw, unprocessed or unrefined gas generated by decomposition at solid waste landfills without treatment, refinement or purification as contemplated by this part; and any such prohibition applicable to landfill gas is expressly deemed to neither refer to nor prohibit the use of refined landfill methane as described in this part.

Acts 2009, ch. 73, § 1.